Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-1,135
Cattle moved to a registered dairy heifer development facility or a qualified dairy; brand inspection; required, when.

Any cattle that originate in a state with a brand inspection agency and that are accompanied by a certificate of inspection or brand clearance issued by such agency may be moved directly from the point of origin into a registered dairy heifer development facility or qualified dairy. Any cattle not accompanied by such a certificate of inspection or brand clearance or by satisfactory evidence of ownership from states or portions of states that do not have brand inspection shall be subjected to physical inspection for brands by the brand committee or, if applicable, subjected to electronic inspection, within a reasonable time after arrival at a registered dairy heifer development facility or qualified dairy, and the inspection fee and surcharge, if applicable, provided under section 54-1,108 shall be collected by the brand inspector at the time the inspection is performed.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 21.
July 18, 2026